Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Chapter 13. Credit Unions
§ 81-13-45.
When borrower may repay loan.

A borrower may repay the whole or any part of his loan on any day on which the office of the corporation is open for the transaction of business.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4252; 1942, § 5413; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-47.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1987, ch 381, § 25 eff from and after July 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1930, § 4253; 1942, § 5414; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; Laws, 1950, ch. 305, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 280, § 4; Laws, 1975, ch. 444, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch 304, § 26]

§ 81-13-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1995, ch. 374, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

[Codes, 1930, § 4254; 1942, § 5415; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 27]

§ 81-13-51.
Portion of net income set apart at close of fiscal year for reserve fund.

Immediately before the payment of each dividend, and in no event less than one (1) time per year, the net income of the credit union shall be determined. From this amount, there shall be set aside, as a regular reserve against losses on loans and against such other losses as may be specified in regulations prescribed under this chapter, sums as follows:

A credit union whose accounts are insured by the National Credit Union Administration, as required by this chapter, shall set aside and maintain its reserve funds in the manner promulgated and prescribed by the administrator of the National Credit Union Administration. Provided, however, that said reserve funds shall be no less than those prescribed by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, who may, upon written notice, require additional reserves to protect the capital structures of any credit union. The board of directors may elect to set apart to the reserve fund any amount deemed necessary if it determines that potential contingencies require additional reserves. The reserve fund shall belong to the credit union and shall be held to meet contingencies and shall not be distributed to the members except upon dissolution of the credit union.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4255; 1942, § 5416; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; Laws, 1950, ch. 305, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 280, § 5; Laws, 1971, ch. 514, § 3; Laws, 1975, ch. 444, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 307, § 9; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 28; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 17; Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-53.
Dividends.

The board of directors of a credit union may declare and pay a dividend from net earnings or accumulated net undivided earnings remaining after the statutory reserve has been set aside.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4256; 1942, § 5417; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; Laws, 1960, ch. 184, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 280; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 29; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 18; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 26; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-55.
Expulsion of members.

At any duly held meeting the board of directors, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of those present may expel from the corporation any member thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4257; 1942, § 5418; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 30; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-57.
Refunds to expelled or withdrawing members.

All amounts paid in on shares of an expelled or withdrawing member with any dividends credited to his shares to the date of expulsion or withdrawal shall be paid to said member but only as funds therefor become available and after deducting any amounts due to the corporation by said member. All deposits of an expelled or withdrawing member, with any interest accrued, shall be paid to such member, subject to ninety (90) days’ notice, and after deducting any amounts due to the corporation by said member. Said member, when withdrawing shares or deposits, shall have no further right in said credit union or to any of its benefits, but such expulsion or withdrawal shall not operate to relieve such member from any remaining liability to the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4258; 1942, § 5419; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 3; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-58.
Deposit in name of two or more persons; payments to successors of deceased depositors without administration.

When a deposit has been made or is hereafter made in the name of two (2) or more persons, payable to any one (1) of those persons, or payable to any one (1) of those persons or the survivor, or payable to any one (1) of those persons or to the survivor or survivors, or payable to the persons as joint tenants, the deposit or any part thereof or interest or dividends thereon may be paid to any one (1) of those persons, without liability whether one or more of those persons is living or not, and the receipt of acquittance of the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the credit union for any payment so made. The making of a deposit in that form, or the making of additions thereto, shall create a presumption in any action or proceeding to which either the credit union or any survivor is a party of the intention of all the persons named on the deposit to vest title to the deposit and the additions thereto and all interest or dividends thereon in the survivor or survivors. Any credit union may pay to the successor of a deceased depositor, as defined in Section 91-7-322(2), without necessity of administration, any sum to the credit of the decedent not exceeding Twelve Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($12,500.00), without liability to any other persons, relatives or beneficiaries, and the receipt of acquittance of the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge to the credit union for any payment so made. This section shall apply to all credit unions, including state and federal credit unions within the state. The term “deposit” as used in this section shall include, but not be limited to, any form of deposit or account, such as a savings account, checking account, time deposit, demand deposit or certificate of deposit, whether negotiable, nonnegotiable or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 458, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-59.
Voluntary dissolution.

At any meeting, called for the purpose, notice of the purpose being contained in the call, a majority of the entire membership may vote to dissolve the corporation and shall, thereupon signify their consent to such dissolution in writing and shall file such consent with the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance, attested by a majority of its officers, with a statement of the names and addresses of the directors and officers, duly verified. The commissioner, upon receipt of satisfactory proof of the solvency of the corporation, shall execute in duplicate a certificate to the effect that such consent and statement have been filed and that it appears therefrom that the corporation had complied with this section. Such duplicate certificate shall be filed by such corporation in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which said corporation has its place of business and thereupon such credit union shall be dissolved and shall cease to carry o n business except for the purpose of adjusting and winding up its affairs. It shall, by its board of directors, then proceed to adjust and wind up its business, be empowered to carry out its contracts, collect its accounts receivable, and liquidate its assets and apply the same in discharge of the obligations of the corporation and, after paying such obligations, each share according to the amount paid in thereon, shall be entitled to its proportion of the balance of the assets. Said corporation shall continue in existence for the purpose of discharging its debts and obligations, collecting and distributing its assets, and doing all other acts required in order to wind up its business, and may sue and be sued for the purpose of enforcing such debts and obligations until its affairs are fully adjusted and wound up, for three (3) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4259; 1942, § 5420; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 32; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 19; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-60.
Establishment of branch office.

Any state credit union may apply to the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance for permission to establish a branch office. The application shall be in such a form as may be prescribed by the commissioner and shall be approved or denied by the commissioner within one hundred twenty (120) days of filing.

The commissioner shall approve a branch application when all of the following criteria are met:

The applicant has an examination rating of two (2) or higher;

The applicant has capital ratios equal or exceeding the amount required by the insurer of deposit accounts;

The applicant has no formal or informal enforcement actions outstanding; and

The applicant has demonstrated that its members would be well served by the branch.

If the commissioner denies the branch application, the branch applicant will have the right of a hearing as prescribed in Section 81-13-1 for those applicants denied a new credit union.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 330, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-61.
Change of place of business.

A credit union may change its place of business upon written approval from the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4260; 1942, § 5421; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 33; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 20; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-62.
Electronic banking terminals.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meanings provided in this subsection unless the context otherwise requires:

“Electronic terminal” means an unmanned electronic device owned or operated by a federally insured credit union through which a consumer may initiate an electronic fund transfer.

“Electronic fund transfer” means any of the following:

The withdrawal of cash from or the deposit of cash or checks into an unmanned electronic device, such as an automatic teller machine, but not including night depositories;

An application for or acceptance of a loan through use of an unmanned electronic device;

The transfer of funds between accounts through use of an unmanned electronic device; or

The issuance of a check by an unmanned electronic device.

Any state credit union may apply to the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance for permission to establish electronic terminals. The application shall be in such a form as may be prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall approve the electronic terminal when all of the following criteria are met:

The applicant has an examination rating of two (2) or higher;

The applicant has capital ratios equal or exceeding the amount required by the insurer of deposit accounts;

The applicant has no formal or informal enforcement actions outstanding; and

The applicant has demonstrated that its members would be well served by the electronic terminal.

For the use of its electronic terminals connected to sharing networks or systems, a credit union may impose a fee if imposition of the fee is disclosed at a time and in a manner that allows a user to terminate or cancel the transaction without incurring the transaction fee. Such fee shall not exceed Two Dollars ($2.00) or four percent (4%) of the gross amount of the transaction, whichever is greater. An agreement to share electronic terminals shall not prohibit, limit or restrict the right of a credit union to charge such fees for the use of its electronic terminals as allowed by state or federal law, or require a credit union to limit or waive its rights or obligations under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 330, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-63.
Taxation.

The credit unions organized hereunder, their property, their franchises, capital, reserves, surpluses, and other funds, and their income shall be exempt from all taxation now or hereafter imposed; except that any real property and any tangible personal property of such credit unions shall be subject to federal, state, county, municipal or other local taxation to the same extent as other similar property is taxed. Nothing herein contained shall prevent holdings in any credit union organized hereunder from being included in the valuation of the personal property of the owners or holders thereof in assessing taxes imposed by authority of the state or political subdivision thereof in which the credit union is located; but the duty or burden of collecting or enforcing the payment of such a tax shall not be imposed upon any such credit union and the tax shall not exceed the rate of taxes imposed upon holdings in federal credit unions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4261; 1942, § 5422; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; Laws, 1960, ch. 185, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 34; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-65.
Conversion from state to federal credit union and from federal to state credit union.

A state credit union may be converted into a federal credit union by complying with the following requirements:

The proposition for such conversion shall first be approved, and a date set for a vote thereon by the members, either at a regular meeting or a special meeting called for that purpose by a majority of the directors of the state credit union. Written notice of the proposition and of the date set for the vote shall be delivered or mailed to each member, not more than thirty (30) days nor less than seven (7) days prior to such date. Approval of the proposition for conversion shall be by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members attending said meeting.

A statement of the results of the vote, verified by the affidavits of the president or vice president and the secretary, shall be filed with the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance within ten (10) days after the vote is taken.

Promptly after the vote is taken and in no event later than ninety (90) days thereafter, if the proposition for conversion was approved by such vote, the credit union shall take such action as may be necessary under the Federal Credit Union Act to make it a federal credit union, and within ten (10) days after receipt of the federal credit union charter there shall be filed with the commissioner a copy of the charter thus issued. Upon such filing the credit union shall cease to be a state credit union.

Upon ceasing to be a state credit union, such credit union shall no longer be subject to any of the provisions of this chapter. The successor federal credit union shall be vested with all of the assets and shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of the state credit union to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place.

A federal credit union, organized under the Federal Credit Union Act, may be converted into a state credit union by:

Complying with all federal requirements requisite to enabling it to convert to a state credit union or cease being a federal credit union;

Filing with the commissioner proof of such compliance, satisfactory to the commissioner;

Filing with the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance the articles of incorporation required for state credit unions; and

Filing such other statements or proof as may from time to time be required by the commissioner.

Should the commissioner determine that an audit should be made of the credit union prior to approval, he shall direct such audit and the reasonable, actual cost thereof shall be paid by the credit union.

When the commissioner has been satisfied that all of such requirements have been complied with, the commissioner shall approve the charter of incorporation. Upon such approval the federal credit union shall become a state credit union as of the date it ceases to be a federal credit union. The state credit union shall be vested with all of the assets and shall continue to be responsible for all of the obligations of the federal credit union to the same extent as though the conversion had not taken place.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4262; 1942, § 5423; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; Laws, 1960, ch. 185, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 307, § 10; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 35; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 21; Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1987, ch 381, § 25 eff from and after July 1, 1987.

[Codes, 1930, § 4263; 1942, § 5424; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; Laws, 1979, ch. 307, § 11; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 36]

§ 81-13-69.
Method of voting by members; special meetings; number of votes per member; proxies; matters subject to vote.

The bylaws may provide for the taking of referendum votes by the membership upon questions coming before the membership; such voting to be by mail, or otherwise in writing or a combination of viva voce voting and writing.

Special meetings of the members may be held by order of the board of directors or the supervisory committee, and shall be held on request of ten percent (10%) of the members. At all meetings a member shall have but one (1) vote, irrespective of the number of shares held. No shareholder may vote by proxy, but a society, association, copartnership or corporation having membership in the credit union may be represented and voted by one (1) person duly authorized by such society, association, copartnership or corporation to represent it. Provided that the notice of the meeting has stated the question to be considered, the members may decide on any matter of interest to the corporation, may overrule the directors by a three-fourths (3/4) vote of those present, and may amend the bylaws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4264; 1942, § 5425; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 37; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 22; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-71.
Penal laws applicable.

The making of a wilfully false affidavit to any statement, report or other document required by law in connection with the establishment or operating of a credit union shall be perjury and punishable as such, according to the general laws of the state and the embezzlement of any of the funds, securities or other property of a credit union, shall be punishable as such according to the general laws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4265; 1942, § 5426; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 38; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-73.
Record keeping.

Each credit union shall keep sufficient books and accounts in such form as shall be approved by the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance in accordance with the NCUA guidelines. However, any state credit union may cause any or all records, books and accounts at any time in its custody to be reproduced in a format of storage commonly used, whether electronic, imaged, magnetic, microphotographic, or otherwise, and any reproduction so made shall have the same force and effect as the original thereof and be admitted in evidence equally with the original.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4266; 1942, § 5427; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 39; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 23; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 37; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 35; Laws, 2000, ch. 335, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-75.
Conflicting laws repealed.

All laws or parts of laws which otherwise would be in conflict with the provisions of this chapter are to be construed so as not to apply to credit unions to the extent that they would conflict with this chapter but nothing herein shall be taken as repealing any law of the state affecting or regulating the receiving of deposits, the making of loans, the issuance of shares or securities, or the lending of money, or the charging or receiving of interest, except so far as the same applies to and may be involved in or related to the establishment and operating of credit unions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4267; 1942, § 5428; Laws, 1924, ch. 177; reenacted without change, 1982, ch. 304, § 40; reenacted, 1995, ch. 374, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-77.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2001, ch. 408, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

[Laws, 1979, ch. 301, § 51; Laws, 1982, ch. 304, § 41; Laws, 1987, ch. 381, § 24; Laws, 1990, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 39; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 1997.]

§ 81-13-79.
Merger of credit unions; certificate of merger; transfer of rights, assets and interests.

Any credit union may, with the approval of the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance or his successor, merge with another credit union under the existing charter of the other credit union, pursuant to any plan agreed upon by the majority of each board of directors of each credit union joining in the merger, and approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the merging credit union present at a meeting of its members duly called for such purpose, and consented to by any government agency or other organization insuring the accounts of the credit union. Provided, however, such merger shall not be in violation of the provision of Section 81-13-13, which requires a common bond of occupation, association or residence within groups which are members of a credit union.

After agreement by the directors and approval by the members of the merging credit union, the president and secretary of the credit union shall execute a certificate of merger, which shall set forth all of the following:

The time and place of the meeting of the board of directors at which the plan was agreed upon;

The vote in favor of the adoption of the plan;

A copy of the resolution or other action by which the plan was agreed upon;

The time and place of the meeting of the members at which the plan agreed upon was approved; and

The vote by which the plan was approved by the members.

Such certificate and a copy of the plan of merger agreed upon shall be forwarded to the Commissioner of Banking and Consumer Finance or his successor, certified by him, and returned to both credit unions within thirty (30) days.

Upon return of the certificate from the commissioner or his successor, all property, property rights and members’ interest of the merged credit union shall vest in the surviving credit union without deed, endorsement or other instrument of transfer, and all debts, obligations and liabilities of the merged credit union shall be deemed to have been assumed by the surviving credit union under whose charter the merger was effected. The rights and privileges of the members of the merged credit union shall remain intact.

This section shall be construed, whenever possible, to permit a credit union chartered under any other law to merge with one chartered under Section 81-13-1 et seq., or to permit one chartered under Section 81-13-1 et seq. to merge with one chartered under any other law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 526; reenacted, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 38; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 81-13-81.
Approval of foreign credit unions.

No credit union, except credit unions organized under the laws of the United States or under this chapter, shall do business in this state until it has received approval from the Commissioner of the Department of Banking and Consumer Finance.

The commissioner may approve the operation of such a credit union in this state after finding that:

The field of membership to be served by such credit union is not now being adequately served;

There is a need for such credit union to conduct business in the state to adequately serve its members and not merely to solicit new membership;

The credit union is financially solvent;

The credit union’s accounts are insured by the National Credit Union Administration or its successor; and

The credit union has executed an agreement with the commissioner to:

Submit a copy of its annual regulatory examination report;

Designate a resident agent;

Inform members that it is not regulated, insured or supervised by the State of Mississippi; and

Agree to fully comply with the provisions of the Mississippi credit union laws, rules and regulations.

The commissioner may prohibit any such credit union from doing business within the state, or disapprove an application, or suspend or revoke one previously issued, if he finds the credit union not conforming to Mississippi credit union laws, rules and regulations, or finds that twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the credit union’s members are, or are expected to be residents of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 352, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1995, ch. 374, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 368, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 408, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2001.